Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 47 Weapons
11-47-48.
Report of gunshot wounds.

Every physician attending or treating a case of bullet wound, gunshot wound, powder burn, or any other injury arising from or caused by the discharge of a gun, pistol, or other firearm, or whenever any case is treated in a hospital, sanitarium, dispensary, or other institution the person in charge of it, shall report the case at once to the police authorities of the town or city where the physician, hospital, sanitarium, dispensary or institution is located. This section shall not apply to wounds, burns, or injuries received by any member of the armed forces of the United States or of this state while engaged in the actual performance of duty. Whoever violates any provision of this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1384, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-38

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-48

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-48.1.
Report of lost or stolen weapons.

Every person who owns a firearm shall report the loss or theft of their firearm to the local law enforcement agency within twenty-four (24) hours of the discovery of the loss or theft. Whoever knowingly violates this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 87, § 1.

11-47-49.
Firing across highways prohibited.

Every person who shall discharge any firearm or other contrivance arranged to discharge shot, bullets, arrows, darts, or other missiles in or across any public road, street, square, or lane shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or one year in prison, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-39

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-49

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-49.1.
Firing in Blackstone Valley Flood Plain prohibited.

Every person who shall hunt or discharge any firearm within the Blackstone Valley Flood Plains or Marshes, also known as the “Valley Marshes,” shall be subject to:

A fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense;

A fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment for sixty (60) days, or both, for the second offense; and

For any subsequent offense a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment for ninety (90) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 43, § 1.

11-47-50.
Firing without landowner’s permission — Firing in compact area.

Every person, not being at the time under military duty, who shall discharge any firearm, “BB gun”, or other contrivance arranged to discharge shot, bullets, arrows, darts, or other missiles within the compact part of any city or town, or who shall discharge a firearm or other contrivance elsewhere, except upon land owned or occupied by him or her or by permission of the owner or occupant of the land on or into which he or she may shoot, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or one year in prison, or both; provided, that any city or town may by ordinance permit the discharge on non-posted land.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the owner of land who uses, or who gives permission to another to use without charge, a recurve, compound or longbow, provided that they are not used within two hundred fifty feet (250´) of a dwelling house.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 3; P.L. 1954, ch. 3280, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-40

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-50

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 333, § 1.

11-47-51.
Loaded rifles and shotguns in vehicles and roadways.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession a loaded rifle or loaded shotgun or a rifle or shotgun from the magazine of which all shells and cartridges have not been removed while upon or along any public highway, road, lane, or trail within this state; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to deputy sheriffs, the superintendent and members of the state police, prison or jail wardens or their deputies, members of the city or town police force, investigators of the department of attorney general appointed pursuant to §

42-9-8.1

, the director, assistant director and other inspectors and agents at the Rhode Island state fugitive task force appointed pursuant to §

12-6-7.2

[repealed], nor to other duly appointed law enforcement officers, including conservation officers, nor to members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marine Corps of the United States, or the National Guard or organized reserves, when on duty, nor to officers or employees of the United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm, nor to any civilian guard or criminal investigator carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the commanding officer of the military establishment in the state of Rhode Island where he or she is employed by the United States; nor to persons legally engaged in hunting activity pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13 or 18 of title 20.

Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 41; P.L. 2022, ch. 133, § 1, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 134, § 1, effective June 21, 2022.

11-47-51.1.
Discharge of firearm or incendiary or explosive substance or device from motor vehicle.

No person shall unlawfully discharge a firearm or incendiary or explosive substance or device from a motor vehicle in a manner which creates a substantial risk of death or serious personal injury to another person. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) years nor more than twenty (20) years and shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or both.

In all cases under this subsection, the justice imposing sentence shall impose not less than the minimum sentence of ten (10) years imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than that minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. The finding may be based upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of ten (10) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances which he or she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence.

Any person injured as a result of a violation of this section shall be entitled to the civil remedies provided by §

7-15-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 312, § 1.

11-47-52.
Carrying of weapon while under the influence of liquor or drugs.

It is unlawful to carry or transport any firearm in this state when intoxicated or under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-53.
Limitation of prosecutions under §§ 11-47-49 — 11-47-52 — Fines.

No complaint for a violation of any of the provisions of §§

11-47-49

—

11-47-52

shall be sustained unless brought within thirty (30) days after the commission of the offense, and all fines for the violation shall inure to the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 110, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 134, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 177, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 406, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-42

; G.L. 1956, §

11-47-53

; P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 278, § 1.

11-47-54.
Licensing of shooting galleries.

Every person who shall keep any pistol gallery, rifle gallery, or other building or other enclosure in any city or town of this state where firearms are used without a license from the duly constituted licensing authority of the city or town shall, upon conviction, be fined two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense, and five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent offense; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to organizations that receive arms and ammunition from the United States or this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-55.
Enforcement of chapter.

Deputy sheriffs, the superintendent and members of the state police, members of the city or town police force, or other duly appointed law enforcement officers, including conservation officers, shall have the power to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 41.

11-47-56.
Constitutionality.

If any part of this chapter is for any reason declared void, its invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 75, § 1.

11-47-57.
“Mace” or similar substances.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over may carry on his or her person and use, unless otherwise prohibited by law, any non-lethal noxious substance or liquid for his or her protection or the protection of others; however, the use of any non-lethal noxious substance or liquid for any other purpose shall be punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 406, § 1.

11-47-58.
Firearms — State preemption.

The control of firearms, ammunition, or their component parts regarding their ownership, possession, transportation, carrying, transfer, sale, purchase, purchase delay, licensing, registration, and taxation shall rest solely with the state, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 443, § 1.

11-47-59.
Possession of knife during commission of crime.

No person shall commit or attempt to commit any crime of violence while having in his or her possession a knife with a blade more than three (3) inches long. Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be sentenced for a term not less than one year nor more than five (5) years and/or fined not exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 248, § 1.

11-47-60.
Possession of firearms on school grounds.

No person shall have in his or her possession any firearm or other weapons on school grounds.

For the purposes of this section, “school grounds” means the property of a public or private elementary or secondary school or in those portions of any building, stadium, or other structure on school grounds that were, at the time of the violation, being used for an activity sponsored by or through a school in this state or while riding school-provided transportation.

Every person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any juvenile adjudicated delinquent pursuant to this statute shall, in addition to whatever other penalties are imposed by the family court, lose his or her license to operate a motor vehicle for up to six (6) months. If the juvenile has not yet obtained the necessary age to obtain a license, the court may impose as part of its sentence a delay in his or her right to obtain the license when eligible to do so, for a period of up to six (6) months.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person who shall be exempt pursuant to the provisions of §

11-47-9

, who is a “peace officer” as defined in §

12-7-21

; a retired law enforcement officer permitted under §

11-47-18(b)

or pursuant to 18 U.S.C. §§ 926B and 926C; or an individual in accordance with a contract entered into between a school and the individual or an employer of the individual to provide security services to the school; or to the following activities when the activities are officially recognized and sanctioned by the educational institution:

Firearm instruction and/or safety courses;

Government-sponsored military-related programs such as ROTC;

Interscholastic shooting and/or marksmanship events;

Military history and firearms collection courses and/or programs; and

The use of blank guns in theatrical and/or athletic events.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to colleges, universities, or junior colleges.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the possession of a firearm that is not loaded and is in a locked container or a locked rack that is in a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 338, § 2, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 343, § 2, effective July 12, 2021.

11-47-60.1.
Safe storage.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce or limit any existing right to purchase and own firearms and/or ammunition or to provide authority to any state or local agency to infringe upon the privacy of any family, home or business except by lawful warrant.

A person who stores or leaves on premises under his or her control a loaded firearm and who knows or reasonably should know that a child is likely to gain access to the firearm without the permission of the child’s parent or guardian, and the child obtains access to the firearm and causes injury to himself or herself or any other person with the firearm, is guilty of the crime of criminal storage of a firearm and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. For purposes of this section, a “child” is defined as any person who has not attained the age of sixteen (16) years.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply whenever any of the following occurs:

The child obtains the firearm as a result of an illegal entry of any premises by any person or an illegal taking of the firearm from the premises of the owner without permission of the owner;

The firearm is kept in a locked container or in a location which a reasonable person would believe to be secured;

The firearm is carried on the person or within such a close proximity so that the individual can readily retrieve and use the firearm as if carried on the person;

The firearm is locked with a locking device;

The child obtains or obtains and discharges the firearm in a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person;

The person who keeps a loaded firearm on any premises which is under his or her custody or control has no reasonable expectations, based on objective facts and circumstances, that a child is likely to be present on the premises.

If the person who allegedly violated this section is the parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies as the result of an accidental shooting, the attorney general’s department shall consider among other factors, the impact of the injury or death on the person who has allegedly violated this section when deciding whether to prosecute an alleged violation.

It is the intent of the general assembly that a parent or guardian of a child who is injured or who dies of an accidental shooting shall be prosecuted only in those instances in which the parent or guardian behaved in a grossly negligent manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 62, § 1.

11-47-60.2.
Possession of weapons on school grounds — Notification.

If a student is found to be carrying a weapon, as defined in §

11-47-42

, a firearm or replica of a firearm, or commits an aggravated assault on school grounds as defined in §

11-47-60

, the principal or designee shall immediately notify the student’s parents and the local police and turn the weapon over, if any, to the local enforcement agency.

Any person who has reasonable cause to know that any person is in violation of this statute shall notify the principal or designee. The principal or designee shall immediately notify the student’s parents and the local police. Any person acting in good faith who makes a report under this section shall have immunity from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making the report.

School superintendents shall receive notice from the clerk of the family court regarding the disposition of all cases involving juveniles from their school districts adjudged pursuant to this statute. This information shall remain confidential and be shared with school officials who deal directly with the student.

The provisions of this section should not apply to the following activities when the activities are officially recognized and sanctioned by the educational institution:

Firearm instructed and/or safety course;

Government-sponsored military-related programs such as ROTC;

Interscholastic shooting and/or marksmanship events;

Military history and firearms collection courses and/or programs; and

The use of blank guns in theatrical and/or athletic events.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to colleges, universities or junior colleges.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 313, § 1.

11-47-60.3.
Trigger lock required.

No licensed retail dealer shall deliver any pistol to any purchaser without providing a trigger lock or other safety device designed to prevent an unauthorized user from operating the pistol.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 221, § 1.

11-47-61.
Drive-by shootings.

Every person who shall discharge a firearm from a motor vehicle in a manner which creates a substantial risk of death or serious injury shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 3.

11-47-62.
Rifle ranges — Immunity from prosecution — Criminal or civil.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, it shall be lawful for an owner of a rifle, pistol, silhouette, archery, skeet, trap, black powder, or other similar range to operate the range in excess of the applicable noise or noise pollution, law, ordinance or bylaw, provided the owner of the range continues to be in compliance with any applicable noise control law, ordinance or bylaws in existence at the time of the construction of the range. No owner shall be liable in any action for nuisance, and no court shall enjoin the use or operation of the range on the basis of noise or noise pollution, provided the owner continues to be in compliance with any noise control law, ordinance or bylaws in effect at the time of the construction of the range.

No standards in rules adopted by any state, city or town agency for limiting levels of noise in terms of decibel level which may occur in the outdoor atmosphere shall apply to the ranges exempted from liability under the provisions of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit an owner of a rifle, pistol, silhouette, archery, skeet, trap, black powder, or other similar range to change the use and/or type of the range, or to expand the use and/or type of the range.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 225, § 1.

11-47-63.
Relief from disqualifiers program.

Establishment of board. There is hereby established a board known as the relief from disqualifiers board to consider petitions for relief from a firearms prohibition due to an adjudication of commitment in Rhode Island.

The board shall be comprised of five (5) members to be appointed by the governor subject to the following qualifications:

One of whom shall be a licensed psychiatrist;

One of whom shall be a licensed psychologist;

One of whom shall be an active member of law enforcement in the state of Rhode Island;

One of whom shall be the director of the department of behavioral health, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his/her designee; and

One of whom shall be the attorney general or his/her designee.

Each member shall serve for a term of three (3) years; provided, however, that of the initial members appointed to the board by the governor, two (2) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years and three (3) shall be appointed to a term of three (3) years. As the term of office of a member of the board expires, his or her successor shall be appointed in a like manner for a term of three (3) years provided that a member shall continue to serve until an appointment is made by the governor. Any vacancy shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

Relief from disqualifiers program. A person who is subject to the disqualifiers of 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4) and/or §

40.1-5-8

because of an adjudication commitment under the laws of this state may petition for relief from a firearms prohibition from the relief from disqualifiers board. The board shall consider the petition for relief in accordance with the following:

The board shall give the petitioner the opportunity to present evidence to the board in a closed and confidential hearing on the record;

A record of the hearing shall be maintained by the board for purposes of appellate review; and

The board shall conduct said hearing within thirty (30) days of the filing of a petition for relief.

In determining whether to grant relief, the board shall consider evidence regarding the following:

The circumstances regarding the firearms disqualifiers pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4);

The petitioner’s record, that must include at a minimum, the petitioner’s mental health record, including a certificate of a medical doctor or psychiatrist licensed in this state certifying that the person is no longer suffering from a mental disorder that interferes or handicaps the person from handling deadly weapons;

All records pertaining to the petitioner’s criminal history; and

Evidence of the petitioner’s reputation through character witness statements, testimony, or other character evidence.

The board shall have the authority to require that the petitioner undergo a clinical evaluation and risk assessment, the results of which may also be considered as evidence in determining whether to approve or deny the petition for relief.

After a hearing on the record, the board shall grant relief provided that it finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that:

The petitioner is not likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety; and

Granting the relief will not be contrary to the public interest.

The board shall issue a decision in writing justifying the reasons for a denial or grant of relief.

Any person whose petition for relief has been denied by the board shall have a right to a de novo judicial review in the superior court. The superior court shall consider the record of the board hearing on the petition for relief, the decision of the board, and, at the court’s discretion, any additional evidence it deems necessary to conduct its review.

Upon notice that a petition for relief has been granted, the district court shall, as soon as practicable:

Cause the petitioner’s record to be updated, corrected, modified, or removed from any database maintained, and made available to, the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) and reflect that the petitioner is no longer subject to a firearms prohibition as it relates to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4); and

Notify the attorney general of the United States that the petitioner is no longer subject to a firearms prohibition pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4).

The district court shall adopt rules relating to the transmission of information relating to civil commitments pursuant to §

40.1-5-8(l)

and to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS), and the relief from disqualifiers process as set forth herein. In preparing such rules, the district court shall consult with the department of behavioral health, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the attorney general, and such other entities as may be necessary or advisable. Such regulations shall include provisions to protect the identity, confidentiality, and security of all records and data provided pursuant to this section and §

40.1-5-26

.

Any member of the relief from firearms disqualifications board, its agents, servants, and employees shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any official act or decision, related to this section, performed or made in good faith.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 455, § 1.

11-47-64.
Sale of ammunition.

For the purposes of this section “ammunition” means a loaded cartridge, consisting of a primed case, propellant or projectile, designed for use in any firearm as defined in §

11-47-2

.

No person, firm or corporation shall sell ammunition to any person unless such person is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and, after December 31, 2022, holds a valid pistol/revolver safety certificate or Rhode Island hunter education course card issued by the department of environmental management.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-time members of the state marshal’s office, full-time members of city or town police departments, or state marshals or correctional officers, persons serving on active duty as a member of the United States armed forces or organized reserves or National Guard, or persons licensed to carry a firearm pursuant to §

11-47-11

or §

11-47-18

.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a felony and may be punished by up to five (5) years imprisonment and/or a five thousand dollar ($5,000) fine.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 135, § 2, effective June 21, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 136, § 2, effective June 21, 2022.